Utah statutes.
4-32-20.   Suspension or revocation -- Grounds.
The department may upon its own motion, and shall upon the verified complaint
in writing of any person, investigate or cause to be investigated the
operation of any meat establishment, and may suspend or revoke the license of
the meat establishment upon any of the following grounds:
(1)  the license was obtained by any false or misleading statement;
(2)  for slaughtering any animal without an antemortem and a postmortem
inspection, or for processing any meat or poultry or products of either that
have not been inspected and passed, (or exempted) and so identified;
(3)  the advertising or publicizing of any false or misleading statements that
pertain to the slaughtering, processing, or distribution of animals or meat or
poultry products;
(4)  the failure to maintain refrigeration, sanitation, or dispose of waste as
required by rules of the department; or
(5)  the failure to comply with rules of the department pertaining to the
disposal of carcasses or parts of carcasses that have been determined to be
unfit for human consumption.
